Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 3 Livestock Auctions

Cross references.

Making of implied warranties by companies auctioning cattle, hogs, and sheep, §

11-2-316

.

Sales by auction generally, §

11-2-328

.

Auctions of wild animals, §

27-5-11

.

Regulation of business of auctioneers generally, T. 43, C. 6.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Auction markets, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Animal Health Division, Chapter 40-13-6.

Licensing and bonding requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Animal Health Division, Licensing, Chapter 40-13-7.01.

4-6-40.
[Reserved] Definitions.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1983.

4-6-41.
[Reserved] Administration of chapter; promulgation of rules and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1983.

4-6-42.
Surety bond — Generally.

No person shall operate a sales establishment for the sale of livestock at auction unless he or she has then in force a surety in an amount established in a memorandum of agreement with the department sufficient to secure the performance of the obligations of the holder of such surety.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 2; Ga. L. 1958, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1804, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 8/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote this Code section.

4-6-43.
Surety bond — Dealers generally.

No dealer shall purchase livestock at any sales establishment or directly from producers unless he or she has then in force a surety in an amount established in a memorandum of agreement with the department sufficient to secure the performance of the obligations of the holder of such surety.

This Code section shall not be applicable to nor shall a surety be required of a dealer who purchases livestock at sales establishments for cash only. No livestock market operator shall permit a dealer who is not properly licensed and holding surety to purchase livestock other than for cash.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 309, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 530, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1804, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 4; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 9/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote subsection (a); deleted former subsection (b), which read: “An amount calculated under subsection (a) of this Code section, if not a multiple of $5,000.00, shall be rounded up to the nearest multiple of $5,000.00.”; redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), substituted “surety” for “bond” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “dealer who is not properly licensed and holding surety” for “dealer or broker who is not properly licensed and bonded”.

Editor’s notes.

The 1984 amendment, effective February 3, 1984, directed that “One hundred thirty” be substituted for “130” in subparagraph (a)(1)(B). The Act should have directed that the change be made in subparagraph (a)(2)(B) instead, and this Code section has been edited accordingly.

4-6-44.
[Repealed] Surety bond — Annual sales and purchases.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-6-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 10/HB 49, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

The 1983 Act, effective July 1, 1983, repealed former Code Section 4-6-44, based on Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 4, and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment act), which dealt with the number of bonds required under former Code Sections 4-6-42 and 4-6-43, and enacted the former Code section.

4-6-45.
[Reserved] Surety bond — Acceptance of insurance coverage as satisfaction of bonding requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 5, and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment act); repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1983.

4-6-46.
Maintenance of records and accounts; inspections.

Sales establishments for the sale of livestock at auction shall maintain such accounts and records as will at all times disclose the names of the sellers or consignors, the amount due and payable to each from the custodial account for shippers’ proceeds, and the legally authorized fees and charges due the establishment. Sales establishments shall make such records available for inspection by the Commissioner or his agents during any business hours.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 350, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-47.
When payment for livestock purchased due; disposition of proceeds; methods of payment.

Payment for livestock purchased at auction shall be made on the same date of the purchase of the livestock, except that persons regulated by the provisions of the federal Packers and Stockyards Act may make payment by placing in the mail a check on the day following the date of purchase. The proceeds from the sale of livestock shall be deposited by the livestock sales establishment in the custodial account not later than the next banking day following the date of sale or receipt of payment by mail. Payment for livestock purchased at auction shall be made by cash, check, draft, or transfer of funds by wire. No loans shall be made from the custodial account of any livestock sales establishment to any purchaser of livestock at that sales establishment.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 71, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2061, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Packers and Stockyards Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

7 U.S.C. § 181

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Payment for livestock purchased at auction, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-11.

4-6-48.
Report of dishonor of a check or draft issued in payment for livestock.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of each livestock sales establishment to report to the Commissioner within 24 hours after having knowledge that a check or draft issued in payment for livestock has been dishonored; and it shall be the duty and responsibility of the Commissioner to notify all licensed sales establishments of the fact of such dishonor of any such check or draft issued in payment for livestock.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 71, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Payment for livestock purchased at auction, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-11.

4-6-49.
[Reserved] Annual reports of sales and purchases; proof of compliance with bonding requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 800, § 6; repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 11/HB 49, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 11/HB 49 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2017.

4-6-49.1.
Denial of licenses; Commissioner’s right to require disclosures and examine records and accounts; dealers purchasing livestock for cash only; financial statement.

No license shall be issued to or allowed to be maintained by any sales establishment or dealer if:

Any beneficial interest in the business of the sales establishment or dealer is directly or indirectly owned by a defaulter; or

Any defaulter is employed in a management position by the sales establishment or dealer.

As used in this Code section, the term “defaulter” means any person who has, within the past five years, been employed in a managerial position by or owned any beneficial interest in the business of a sales establishment or dealer and such business has ceased operations without satisfying all liabilities of the business either from assets of the business or from any surety.

The Commissioner shall have full authority to require disclosure from licensees and applicants of information sufficient to determine whether the licensee or applicant is qualified to be licensed under this Code section. The Commissioner shall have full authority to examine the records and accounts of all licensees in order to determine whether any proceeds of the business are being paid to any defaulter.

This Code section shall not prohibit the Commissioner from allowing a defaulter to operate as a dealer who purchases livestock for cash only.

All applicants for licensure shall submit to the Commissioner a current financial statement, and all licensees shall submit a current financial statement annually.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-6-49.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1804, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 12/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (b), inserted commas following “has” and “years” near the beginning, substituted “dealer and such” for “dealer which” in the middle, and substituted “surety” for “bond or bonds” at the end; and, in subsection (e), substituted a comma for a semicolon.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding powers of Commissioner relating to sale of livestock at auction, §

10-2-52

.

4-6-50.
Livestock weighed at sales establishment; certified public weigher.

All livestock weighed at a sales establishment shall be weighed by a certified public weigher who has complied with Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 10. Each such weigher shall obtain a seal and upon request shall impress the seal upon the scale ticket of the livestock weighed.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 5; Ga. L. 1958, p. 309, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-51.
Isolation of employees of sales establishments during conduct of sale.

Each sales establishment shall make adequate provision to isolate, insofar as practicable, the auctioneer, weigher, clerk, and any other employee who has any duty in regard to making any record of the sale. No person shall be permitted to converse with any such employee while the employee is performing any duty in connection with the sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-52.
Special sales.

As used in this Code section, “special sale” means any livestock sale, except a regular sale at an establishment and any sale by a farmer of livestock owned by the farmer, with payment made directly to the farmer.

The Commissioner is authorized to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of special sales. No person shall hold a special sale without obtaining a permit therefor from the Commissioner or his or her duly authorized representative, which shall be granted without charge upon submission of proof satisfactory to the Commissioner that the person applying for the permit has procured a surety in an amount equal to one-fourth of the anticipated proceeds of the sale; provided, however, that such surety shall be not less than $10,000.00 and not more than $150,000.00.

Associations holding sales of animals consigned by members of the association only shall not be required to procure a surety if the directors of the association accept full responsibility for financial obligations of sale and release the Commissioner, in writing, from any responsibility.

Georgia 4-H clubs and Georgia Future Farmers of America chapters shall not be required to procure a surety.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 6; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1467, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1804, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 218, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 13/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (b), in the second sentence, inserted “or her” near the middle, substituted “has procured a surety” for “is bonded” in the middle, substituted “that such surety” for “such bond” near the end, and deleted “in amount” following “$150,000.00” at the end; substituted “surety” for “bond” in subsections (c) and (d); redesignated former subsection (c.1) as present subsection (d); and deleted former subsection (d), which read: “Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor”.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Special sales, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-5.

4-6-53.
[Reserved] Injunctions.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 296, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1983.

4-6-54.
Use of persuader in loading or handling of livestock.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any persuader other than an electric prod or canvas flap in the loading or handling of livestock in a public sales establishment.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-55.
[Repealed] Penalty for violation of chapter or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 501, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1, 1983.